incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
 <pardef n="χ/αρίζω__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>αρίσαμε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζαμε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αριστήκαμε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρισες</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίσατε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζατε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίστηκε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρισε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζονταν</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίστηκαν</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρισαν</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίσει</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αριστώ</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίσω</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίσουμε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αριστούμε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίσετε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίσει</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αριστούν</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίσουν</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζω</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζουμε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζετε</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζει</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζεται</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζουν</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζονται</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζοντας</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρίζοντάς</l><r>αρίζω<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="διαμ/ορφώνω__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>όρφωσα</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώσαμε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώναμε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρφωσες</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώσατε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώθηκε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρφωσε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφωνόταν</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρφωνε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώθηκαν</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώνονταν</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρφωσαν</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρφωναν</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφωθεί</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώσει</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώσω</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώσουμε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώνουμε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώσεις</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώσετε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφωθεί</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώσει</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώσουν</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφωθούν</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώνουμε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώνετε</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώνει</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώνεται</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώνονται</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώνουν</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφωνουν</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορφώνοντας</l><r>ορφώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="χαρίζω"><i>χ</i><par n="χ/αρίζω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="επαναδιαμορφώνω"><i>επαναδιαμ</i><par n="διαμ/ορφώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="διαμορφώνω"><i>διαμ</i><par n="διαμ/ορφώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="αναδιαμορφώνω"><i>αναδιαμ</i><par n="διαμ/ορφώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="συνδιαμορφώνω"><i>συνδιαμ</i><par n="διαμ/ορφώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="χαρίζω"><i>χ</i><par n="χ/αρίζω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="επαναδιαμορφώνω"><i>επαναδιαμ</i><par n="διαμ/ορφώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="διαμορφώνω"><i>διαμ</i><par n="διαμ/ορφώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="αναδιαμορφώνω"><i>αναδιαμ</i><par n="διαμ/ορφώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="συνδιαμορφώνω"><i>συνδιαμ</i><par n="διαμ/ορφώνω__vblex"/></e>
